fr: brochet
br: begeg

en: Pollack
fr: Lieu jaune
it: pollack

en: mullet
br: Meilh
fr: mulet
hr: cipal
it: triglia

en: spiny scorpionfish
fr: rascasse
it: scorfano spinoso

en: shellfish
ar: بكلويز
bn: শেলফিশ
ca: marisc
cs: škeble
cy: pysgodyn cragen
da: skaldyr
de: Schalentier, Meeresfrüchten
eo: marisko
es: marisco, mariscos
eu: itsaski
fa: صدف‌ماهی
fi: äyriäinen, äyriäisiä
fr: fruits de mer
ga: Sliogiasc
gd: Maorach
gl: marisco
gv: Eeast shliggagh
he: פירות ים
hr: morski plodovi
hu: kagylófélék
it: frutti di mare
ja: 介類
kn: ಚಿಪ್ಪು ಮೀನು
mk: школка
ms: Kerang-kerangan
nb: skalldyr
nl: schelpdier
nn: skaldyr
pa: ਸ਼ੈਲਫਿਸ਼
pl: owoce morza
pt: marisco
ro: Fructe de mare
ru: моллюск
sq: butak
sv: skaldjur
th: หอย, กะปิ
vi: động vật có vỏ
vo: koanaf

en: shellfish extract
de: Schalentierextrakt
fi: äyriäisuute
hr: ekstrakt školjkaša
it: estratto di molluschi

en: mollusc, molluscs, mollusks, mollusk
af: Weekdiere
am: ዛጎል ለበስ
ar: رخويات , بلح البحر
az: Molyusklar
ba: Моллюскылар
be: малюскі
bg: мекотели
bn: মলাস্কা
br: Blotvil
bs: Mekušci
ca: Mollusc, mol·luscs
cs: měkkýši
cy: Molwsg
da: bløddyr
de: Weichtiere, Weichtieren
el: μαλάκια
eo: molusko
es: molusco, moluscos
et: molluskid, Limused
eu: Molusku
fa: نرم‌تنان
fi: nilviäinen, nilviäiset
fo: Lindýr
fr: mollusque, mollusques
ga: moilisc
gl: Moluscos
gn: Syrymbe
gu: મૃદુકાય સમુદાય
he: רכיכות
hi: मोलस्का
hr: mekušaca, mekušci
hu: puhatestűek
hy: փափկամարմիններ
ia: Mollusca
id: Moluska
io: Molusko
is: Lindýr
it: molluschi
ja: 軟体動物
jv: Moluska
ka: მოლუსკები
kk: Моллюскалар
ko: 연체동물
ky: Моллюскалар
la: Mollusca
lb: Weikdere
lt: moliuskai
lv: gliemji
mk: Мекотели
ml: മൊളസ്ക
ms: Moluska
mt: molluski
nb: Bløtdyr
nl: weekdieren
nn: blautdyr
nv: Bijáád Ádaadinígíí
or: ସନ୍ଧିପଦ
pa: ਮੋਲਸਕਾ
pl: mięczaki
pt: moluscos
qu: Llamp'uka
ro: moluște
rw: Ikinyamushongo
sh: Mekušci
sk: mäkkýše
sl: mehkužci
sr: мекушци
sv: blötdjur
sw: Moluska
ta: மெல்லுடலி
te: మొలస్కా
tg: Нармбаданҳо
th: มอลลัสกา
tl: Mollusca
tr: Yumuşakçalar
uk: молюски
uz: Mollyuskalar
vi: Động vật thân mềm
yi: מאלוסקן
zh: 软体动物

en: abalone
de: Abalone, Abalonen, Haliotis spp.
fi: merikorva, merikorvat
fr: Ormeau
hr: puzlatka
it: abalone
ja: アワビ
pl: Mięczak

en: cockles
be: Сэрцападобнікі
bg: Сърцевидки
ca: Escopinya
cy: cocsen
de: Herzmuscheln
el: κοκκαλιές
es: Berberecho
eu: Berberetxo
fa: آکاگای
fi: Sydänsimpukat
fr: coque, coques
gd: Slige-chabon
gl: Cárdidos
hr: kukuljice
id: Kerang darah
ja: ザルガイ科
ko: 꼬막
la: Cardiidae
lt: Širdutės
lv: Sirsniņgliemeņu dzimta
ms: Kerang
nb: Hjerteskjell
nn: Hjartemusling
nv: Chʼosh bitsʼaʼí dijoolígíí
pl: Sercówka pospolita
ru: сердцевидки
sl: Rdečemesa barčica
sv: Hjärtmusslor
th: หอยแครง
uk: Серцевидкові
vi: Sò huyết
zh: 鸟蛤科

en: cuttlefish
ar: حبار
as: কাটলফিছ
be: Каракаціцы
bg: Сепии
br: Morgad
ca: Sèpia
cs: sépie
de: Sepien
el: Σουπιά
es: sepia
eu: Txibia
fa: سپیداج
fi: seepiat
fr: seiche, seiches
ga: Cudal
gl: Xiba
he: דיונונים
hi: समुद्रफेनी
hr: sipe
hu: Tintahalak
id: Sotong
io: Sepio
it: seppia
ja: コウイカ目
jv: Sotong
kk: Тарбақ аяқ
ko: 갑오징어목
la: Sepiida
lt: Sepijos
ml: കണവ
ms: Sotong Katak
nl: zeekatten
nv: Łóóʼ bigaan neeznání bitsʼinígíí
pl: Mątwy
pt: Choco
ru: Каракатицы, каракатица
sk: Sépie
sl: Sipe
sr: Сипе
su: Balakutak
sv: Sepialiknande bläckfiskar
sw: Dome
ta: கணவாய் மீன்
th: หมึกกระดอง
tr: Mürekkep balığı
uk: Каракатиця
vi: Bộ Mực nang
zh: 乌贼

en: common cuttlefish, Sepia officinalis
bg: обикновена сепия, Sepia officinalis
ca: Sèpia comuna, Sepia officinalis
co: Seppia, Sepia officinalis
cs: sépie obecná, Sepia officinalis
da: Sepiablæksprutte, Sepia officinalis
de: Gewöhnlicher Tintenfisch, Sepia officinalis
et: Harilik seepia, Sepia officinalis
eu: Txibia arrunt, Sepia officinalis
fa: سپیداج معمولی, Sepia officinalis
fi: Seepia, Sepia officinalis
fr: Seiche commune, Sepia officinalis
gl: Sepideos, Sepia officinalis
he: דיונון הרוקחים, Sepia officinalis
hr: obična sipa
hu: Közönséges tintahal, Sepia officinalis
it: seppia comune
ja: ヨーロッパコウイカ, Sepia officinalis
ko: 갑오징어, Sepia officinalis
la: Sepia officinalis
nl: gewone zeekat, Sepia officinalis
pl: Mątwa zwyczajna, Sepia officinalis
ru: Лекарственная каракатица, Sepia officinalis

en: spineless cuttlefish, Sepiella inermis
ar: سپیداج سست‌کمر, Sepiella inermis
de: Wirbelloser Tintenfisch, Sepiella inermis
fr: Seiche sans épines, Sepiella inermis
hr: sipa bez kičme
it: Sepiella inermis
la: Sepiella inermis
zh: 曼氏无针乌贼, Sepiella inermis

en: pharaoh cuttlefish, Sépia Pharaonis
ar: ماهی مرکب ببری, Sépia Pharaonis
de: Pharao-Sepie, Sépia Pharaonis
fi: faaraoseepia, Sépia Pharaonis
fr: seiche pharaon, Sépia Pharaonis
hr: faraon sipa
it: seppia faraone
la: Sépia Pharaonis, Sepia pharaonica
th: หมึกกระดองลายเสือ, Sépia Pharaonis
vi: Mực nang vân hổ, Sépia Pharaonis
zh: 虎斑乌贼, Sépia Pharaonis

en: mussel, mussels
af: Mossel
cs: mušle
de: Muscheln, Miesmuscheln
eo: Mitulo
es: mejillón, Mejillones
eu: Muskuilu
fa: صدف سیاه
fo: Kræklingur
fr: moule, moules
hr: dagnja
id: Kupang
io: Muslo
is: Kræklingur
it: Cozze, Mitili
ja: マッセル
ko: 담치류
nl: mosselen
pt: Mexilhão
ru: мидия
sq: Midhje
tr: Midye
vi: Trai
zh: 淡菜類

en: Mediterranean mussel, Mytilus galloprovincialis
af: Mediterreense mossel, Mytilus galloprovincialis
bg: Черна морска мида, Mytilus galloprovincialis
ca: musclo del Mediterrani, Mytilus galloprovincialis
de: Mittelmeer-Miesmuschel, Mytilus galloprovincialis
es: Genóma del Mejillón, Mytilus galloprovincialis
fi: välimerensimpukka, Mytilus galloprovincialis
fr: Moule méditerranéenne, Mytilus galloprovincialis
gl: Mexillón, Mytilus galloprovincialis
hr: mediteranska dagnja, Mytilus galloprovincialis
it: Mitilo mediterraneo, Mytilus galloprovincialis
ja: ムラサキイガイ, Mytilus galloprovincialis
la: Mytilus galloprovincialis
nl: diepwatermossel, Mytilus galloprovincialis
pl: omułek śródziemnomorski, Mytilus galloprovincialis
ru: Черноморская мидия, Mytilus galloprovincialis
sl: Mediteranska klapavica, Mytilus galloprovincialis
uk: Мідія середземноморська, Mytilus galloprovincialis
vi: Trai Địa Trung Hải, Mytilus galloprovincialis
zh: 地中海貽貝, Mytilus galloprovincialis

en: blue mussel, common mussel, Mytilus edulis
ar: بلح البحر الأزرق, Mytilus edulis
bg: синя мида, Mytilus edulis
cs: slávka jedlá, Mytilus edulis
da: Blåmusling, Mytilus edulis
de: Gemeine Miesmuschel, Mytilus edulis
et: Söödav rannakarp, Mytilus edulis
fi: Sinisimpukka, Mytilus edulis
fr: moule commune, Mytilus edulis
hr: plava dagnja
hu: Ehető kékkagyló, Mytilus edulis
it: cozza blu
ja: ヨーロッパイガイ, Mytilus edulis
ko: 섭조개, Mytilus edulis
la: Mytilus edulis
ml: കല്ലുമ്മക്കായ, Mytilus edulis
nb: blåskjell, Mytilus edulis
pl: omułek jadalny, Mytilus edulis
pt: mexilhão azul, Mytilus edulis
ru: Мидия съедобная, Mytilus edulis
sv: Blåmussla, Mytilus edulis
tr: Mavi midye, Mytilus edulis
uk: Мідія їстівна, Mytilus edulis
vi: Trai xanh, Mytilus edulis
zh: 藍貝, Mytilus edulis

en: Chilean mussel, Mytilus chilensis
de: Chilenische Muschel, Mytilus chilensis
es: chorito
fi: platansinisimpukka, Mytilus chilensis
fr: moules chiliennes, Moule du Chili, Mytilus chilensis
hr: čileanska dagnja
it: cozza cilena, cozze cilene, Mytilus chilensis
la: Mytilus chilensis
sl: Čilska klapavica, Mytilus chilensis
uk: Мідія чилійська, Mytilus chilensis

en: octopus, Raw common octopus
ak: Posena
bg: октопод
de: Krake
eo: Polpo
es: pulpo
fi: tursas
fr: poulpe, poulpes, Poulpe cru
hi: ऑक्टोपस
hr: hobotnica
it: polpo, polpi
ja: マダコ属, タコ
ko: 낙지속
la: Octopus
ml: നീരാളി
nv: Łóóʼ bigaan tseebíí íiyisígíí
pt: Polvo
ru: осьминоги
te: అక్టోపస్
zh: 章鱼属, 章魚丁

en: Common cooked octopus
fr: poulpe cuit
hr: obična kuhana hobotnica
it: polpo cotto comune
nl: gekookte inktvis

en: Octopus Aegina
de: Octopus Aegina
fr: Amphioctopus Aegina, Pieuvre marbrée, Octopus Aegina
hr: hobotnica aegina
it: polpo Egina
la: Octopus Aegina